California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Sixty percent of the moneys shall be allocated to large cities which constitute heavily urbanized areas in the proportion that the population of the recipient bears to the population of all cities and recreation and park districts in heavily urbanized areas throughout the state.

(b) Forty percent of the moneys shall be allocated to large counties and regional park districts which constitute heavily urbanized areas in the proportion that the total population of the recipient bears to the total population of all large counties and regional park districts which constitute heavily urbanized areas throughout the state. Recognizing that the boundaries of counties and regional park districts may overlap, only the population of the jurisdiction which will actually provide and administer the recreational service contemplated shall be counted in the area of overlapping jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1748, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

5630.

Seventeen percent of the moneys available for grant purposes in any one fiscal year shall be available only for need basis grants to cities, counties, and districts on a project-by-project basis and on the basis of need for the acquisition or development of, or for special major maintenance of, recreational lands and facilities, or for innovative recreation programs, on the following basis:

(a) Eighty-eight percent of the moneys shall be available for grants to cities, counties, and districts in nonurbanized areas on a project-by-project basis and on the basis of need for the acquisition or development of, or for special major maintenance of, recreational lands and facilities, or for innovative recreation programs. The criteria for determining need shall include, but are not limited to, deficiencies in existing park and recreational lands and facilities, the impact of participants from outside the jurisdiction, and the overall merit of the grant proposal.

(b) Twelve percent of the moneys shall be available for grants to cities and recreation and park districts in urbanized areas on a project-by-project basis and on the basis of need for the acquisition or development of, or special major maintenance of, recreational lands and facilities, or for innovative recreation programs. The criteria for determining need shall include, but are not limited to, population density and the inability to complete park and recreation projects due to low total assessed valuation in the jurisdiction. Jurisdictions eligible for funds under subdivision (a) of Section 5629 shall not be eligible for funds under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1748, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

5630.5.

Grants may be made to memorial districts only for indoor and outdoor park and recreation facilities that meet the requirements of this chapter and the criteria adopted pursuant to Section 5625.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 879, Sec. 4.   Effective September 10, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5631.

The department, in cooperation with the federal government, local public agencies, and appropriate representatives of industry, shall, from time to time as needed but no less frequently than once every five years, coordinate and conduct a statewide needs analysis in relation to the purposes of this chapter. That analysis shall include a full review of the grant program authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 145.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.3.  The Statewide Park Development and Community Revitalization Act of 2008 [5640. - 5654.]

5640.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Statewide Park Development and Community Revitalization Act of 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5641.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(a) The program created by this chapter will finance the acquisition and development of parks and recreation areas and facilities in the communities that are currently least served by park and recreation facilities by emphasizing the creation of park space and recreational opportunities and the expansion of park accessibility to underserved communities. These underserved communities are often the same areas that suffer most from high unemployment and destructive or unlawful conduct by youth.

(b) The program established by this chapter will encourage community participation in, and a greater sense of responsibility toward, new parks and recreation areas and facilities, which will help keep them clean and safe and which will enhance community pride and sustain neighborhood vitality.

(c) New parks and facilities will provide safe recreational opportunities for children, positive outlets, and secure sites for youth, while also meeting the special recreational and social needs of senior citizens and other population groups.

(d) California suffers from an acute shortage of parks throughout the state, particularly in poor communities.

(e) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature that the funds made available through the Statewide Park Development and Community Revitalization Act of 2008 be used to award competitive grants statewide to advance certain goals and policies, including, but not limited to, assisting in the acquisition of park space or the development of park and recreation opportunities to critically underserved communities. It is further the intent of the Legislature that this be accomplished by delivering project funds to neighborhood and regional park projects in areas of highest need, while offering technical assistance to all applicants and potential applicants for grant preparation to encourage full participation in the grant program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5642.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “City” means a city or the City and County of San Francisco.

(b) “Critically underserved community” means a community that meets either of the following:

(1) Has less than three acres of usable parkland per 1,000 residents.

(2) Is a disadvantaged community, as defined by subdivision (g) of Section 75005, and can demonstrate to the department that the community has insufficient or no park space and recreation facilities.

(c) “District” means one of the following:

(1) A recreation and park district formed under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780).

(2) A public utility district formed under Division 7 (commencing with Section 15501) of the Public Utilities Code in a nonurbanized area that employs a full-time park and recreation director and offers year-round park and recreation services on lands and facilities owned by that district.

(3) A memorial district formed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1170) of Division 6 of the Military and Veterans Code that employs a full-time park and recreation director and offers year-round park and recreation services on lands and facilities owned by that district.

(4) The Malaga County Water District exercising powers authorized under Section 31133 of the Water Code.

(5) A community service district formed under Division 3 (commencing with Section 61000) of Title 6 of the Government Code in a nonurbanized area that is authorized to provide public recreation as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 61100 of the Government Code.

(6) A county service area or zone in the county service area, within the County of San Bernardino that is empowered to provide public park and recreation services pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 25210.1) of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code, that is actually providing public park and recreation services that was reorganized prior to January 1, 1987, from a park and recreation district to a county service area or zone.

(7) A regional park district formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3.

(d) “Facilities” includes, but is not limited to, places for organized team sports, outdoor recreation, and informal turf play; nonmotorized recreational trails; permanent play structures; landscaping; community gardens; places for passive recreation, enjoyment of scenic open space, nature appreciation and study, and outdoor education; multipurpose structures designed to meet the special recreational, educational, vocational, and social needs of youth, senior citizens, and other population groups; recreation areas created by the redesign and retrofit of urban freeways; community swimcenters; regional recreational trails; and infrastructure and other improvements that support these facilities.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (k) of Section 75005, “nonprofit organization” means any nonprofit entity qualified to do business in California, qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code, and that has among its primary purposes the preservation, protection, or enhancement of land or water resources in their natural, scenic, historical, agricultural, forested, or open-space condition or use, or the provision of conservation and environmental education and other recreational, vocational, and educational services to youth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5643.

(a) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall establish a local assistance program to distribute grants to the most critically underserved communities across the state, on a competitive basis, to eligible cities, counties, joint powers authorities, districts, and nonprofit organizations for the acquisition or development, or both, of property for parks and recreation areas and facilities.

(b) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall encourage joint partnership projects, if available, between two or more agencies, including, but not limited to, school districts, nonprofit organizations, and local governmental agencies in order to enhance investment of public resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5643.6.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the local assistance program created by this chapter fund both neighborhood parks and regional parks and trails.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5644.

Eligible applicants for grants pursuant to this chapter are cities, counties, regional park districts, districts, joint powers authorities, and nonprofit organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5645.

The department may award a grant pursuant to this chapter only for a project that meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The proposed project will create a new park where one currently does not exist, a new recreational facility, or new recreational opportunity.

(b) The applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the project is located in a critically underserved community, or in the case of a regional park or trail, the project is within close proximity to one or more critically underserved communities.

(c) The proposed project is designed to provide efficient use of water and other natural resources, which may include, but is not limited to, projects that use climate-appropriate vegetation, reduce stormwater runoff, capture and store stormwater, minimize the use of pesticides and fertilizers, incorporate pervious surfaces into project design, or use construction methods that use recycled materials and minimize construction waste.

(d) The amount of the grant applied for, together with any matching contribution, will meet all the costs of acquiring or developing, or both, the new park or facilities, or new recreational opportunities, and when construction of the project is completed, the new park or facility will be fully usable by the residents of the critically underserved community.

(e) The project applicant or partnering entities will provide for public safety and recreational opportunities following project completion.

(f) Following project completion, the project’s weekday and weekend operating hours will accommodate the needs of the community residents. Entrance or membership fees shall not significantly deter use by community residents. Pursuant to receiving these funds, fees cannot be limited to nonresidents of the community in which the park space or recreational opportunity is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5646.

In evaluating applications for grants that meet the requirements of Section 5645, the department shall assign higher priority to applications, for each of the following criteria satisfied:

(a) The project will acquire new parks, develop new parks, expand overused parks, or create a new recreational opportunity in a community that has demonstrated insufficient or no park space and recreation facilities. In evaluating the deficiency level of park and recreation facilities in a critically underserved community, the department shall consider the number of acres of usable parkland per 1,000 residents.

(b) The critically underserved community has a significant percent of persons living at or below the poverty level.

(c) The project will enhance workforce development and employment opportunities, utilize members of the California Conservation Corps or certified local conservation corps, if available, or accommodate outdoor learning opportunities for school pupils or at-risk youth in the service area.

(d) The project applicant has actively involved the public and community-based groups in the selection and planning of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5647.

(a) The department shall adopt guidelines to amplify or clarify the criteria specified in this chapter, and may adopt additional criteria, to supplement those criteria, but the scope of the additional criteria shall be limited to providing additional guidance in selecting projects in areas that have the greatest deficiencies in parks and facilities.

(b) The department shall develop a procedural guide for the administration of this chapter and the guidance of applicants.

(c) The department shall solicit written comments and hold public hearings at convenient locations throughout the state on any guideline or procedural guide that is proposed to be adopted or developed pursuant to this section.

(d) The department shall offer technical assistance to all applicants and potential applicants for grant preparation in order to encourage full participation in the grant program.

(e) The department shall allow grantees to spend no more than 25 percent of the grant amount for project planning, design, compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), and other incidental, but directly related, construction or acquisition costs.

(f) The department shall adopt the guidelines or develop the procedural guide on or before April 1, 2009.

(g) Any regulation or procedural guide adopted or developed pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the review or approval of the Office of Administrative Law or to any other requirement of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5648.

(a) The local assistance program created by this chapter is intended to include grants for the acquisition or development, or both, of parcels of property of any size that will serve residents of a critically underserved community and otherwise meet the requirements of this chapter. The department shall not assign an application a lower priority on the basis that the application proposes the acquisition of a city lot or other small parcel.

(b) A grant may be expended to acquire the fee title, a leasehold, or other interest in real property. If an application proposes to acquire less than fee title, the applicant shall demonstrate in the application, to the satisfaction of the department, that the proposed project will provide public benefits that are commensurate with the type and duration of the interest in real property to be acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5649.

(a) An eligible nonprofit organization may apply for a grant on its own behalf or on behalf of an eligible city, county, or district pursuant to a contract with that city, county, or district to acquire and develop the park or recreation area. The application may include a copy of the contract and the resolution or other authorization for the contract. The contract shall specify arrangements for the long-term management and operation of the park or recreation area.

(b) An eligible applicant may apply for a grant to develop state-owned parklands if the applicant manages those lands under a contract with the state without state reimbursement for management costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5650.

(a) Every applicant for a grant pursuant to this chapter and the entity that will operate and maintain the property, if that entity is different than the applicant, shall agree to comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) To operate and maintain the property developed pursuant to this chapter so that it is usable by residents of the targeted critically underserved community. With the approval of the department, the grant recipient, or its successor in interest in the property, may transfer its property interest and the responsibility to operate and maintain the property, in accordance with the terms of the grant and any applicable law, to a public agency or nonprofit organization that is able to operate and maintain the property in perpetuity. Any attempt to make a transfer in violation of this subdivision is void.

(2) To use the property only for the purposes for which the grant was made and to make no other use or sale or other disposition of the property, except as authorized by specific act of the Legislature. If the use of the property is changed to a use that is not permitted by the terms of the grant, or if the property is sold or otherwise disposed of, the grant recipient shall reimburse the state an amount equal to the amount of the grant, the fair market value of the land and any improvements constructed with the grant, or the proceeds from the sale or other disposition, whichever amount is greatest. If the property that is sold or otherwise disposed of is less than the entire interest in the property funded with the grant, the grant recipient shall reimburse the state an amount equal to either the proceeds from the sale or other disposition of the interest or the fair market value of the interest sold or otherwise disposed of, whichever amount is greater.

(b) In lieu of seeking reimbursement pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the department may impose restrictions on the use of public park property identical to the requirements for the preservation of public parks set forth in the Public Park Preservation Act of 1971 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 5400)) with respect to any property used, sold, or otherwise disposed of in a manner not permitted by the terms of the grant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5652.

A grant recipient shall encumber grant moneys within three years of the date of the approval of the grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 876, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5652.5.

A grant recipient shall encumber grant moneys within three years of the date of the approval of the grant and grant moneys shall be liquidated within eight years from the date of appropriation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5653.

Five business days after awarding a grant pursuant to this chapter, the department shall make information available on the department’s Internet Web site regarding the status of the grant and other relevant information, including, but not limited to, a geographic breakdown of awarded grants and the overall amount applied for by all grant applicants, the total amount applied for by awarded grant applicants, each award amount, and a brief description of the funded projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 623, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5654.

The provisions of this chapter shall be implemented only in a fiscal year for which funding is provided for that purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 876, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Presley Urban Fishing Program [5670. - 5686.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5670. - 5671.]

5670.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Presley Urban Fishing Program Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5671.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(a) There is a great, measurable demand for the provision of increased fishing opportunities in the major metropolitan areas of California.

(b) There is a high concentration of urban social and economic problems in California’s major metropolitan areas that can be partially alleviated by the increased recreational activities and supplemental food sources afforded by fishing opportunities.

(c) In view of the foregoing, the Legislature declares that an active, cooperative, and funded urban fishing program should be implemented without delay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 571.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [5675. - 5686.]

5675.

The program established by this chapter shall be administered jointly by the Department of Parks and Recreation and the Department of Fish and Game and shall be funded by moneys appropriated from the Resources Account in the Energy and Resources Fund to the Department of Parks and Recreation for local assistance grants for urban fishing projects pursuant to category (b) of Item 379-101-190 of the Budget Act of 1981 and pursuant to provisions of any budget acts enacted subsequent thereto that appropriate funds for the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5676.

The Department of Parks and Recreation shall have principal responsibility for the review and approval of proposals for rehabilitating urban lakes in accordance with the eligibility requirements, evaluative criteria, and procedures specified in this chapter and for the administration of grants made pursuant to this chapter. The Department of Fish and Game shall be responsible for determining the rehabilitative potential of lakes proposed for funding and shall serve primarily in a technical and advisory capacity. The final decision to provide funding for each project shall be based on the cooperative deliberation and mutual determination of both departments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5677.

To be eligible for funding pursuant to this chapter, a project shall satisfy all of the following conditions:

(a) The lake is situated in an urbanized area of a standard metropolitan statistical area.

(b) The lake is close to, and accessible by residents of, an area comprised of economically disadvantaged persons.

(c) The lake is served by public transportation and is readily accessible by a large proportion of the residents of the entire metropolitan area.

(d) There is significant and demonstrated public support and interest in the community for rehabilitating the lake for sportfishing purposes.

(e) The lake currently has, or when rehabilitated will have, a water surface area of not less than three acres.

(f) The lake is located in a public park or recreation area operated and currently staffed by the applicant.

(g) The lake is held in fee by the applicant or is leased by the applicant for a term of not less than 25 years.

(h) The applicant has prepared, and submitted as part of the grant proposal, a plan for rehabilitating the lake that includes evidence of the potential for the lake, when rehabilitated, to support and sustain a fish population through natural reproduction; techniques, procedures, and costs projected for the rehabilitation and future maintenance and operation of the lake; and an assessment of the benefits to be derived from implementing the proposal. The plan shall be suitable for forming the basis of the agreement specified in Section 5680 if the proposal is approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5678.

With respect to any project proposal that has satisfied all the conditions of Section 5677, the departments shall use all of the following criteria to evaluate the relative desirability and establish a ranking of all proposals:

(a) An assessment of the needs to be satisfied by an urban fishing program at the lake, based on the total population, income levels, age groups, special populations, availability of other recreational facilities in the area, and such other factors or characteristics of the area as the Department of Parks and Recreation deems necessary for a full evaluation of the proposal. Priority shall be assigned to proposals that will serve a higher proportion of economically disadvantaged persons and special populations relative to those to be served under other proposals.

(b) The willingness and ability of the applicant to commence work immediately upon receiving a grant.

(c) The lake, when rehabilitated, will have relatively lower maintenance and operation costs.

(d) The applicant’s project completion rate with respect to local assistance grants made pursuant to other programs administered by the Department of Parks and Recreation and the applicant’s general stewardship record with respect to its parks and recreation facilities.

(e) The existence of opportunities for alternative and multiple-use recreational activities at the lake and surrounding parkland or open-space areas.

(f) Funding the proposal will further a broad geographical spread of urban fishing programs among metropolitan areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5679.

Grants may be made to a city, county, or district that provides park, recreation, or open-space facilities and services and will operate and maintain the lake. Grants may be expended only for the rehabilitation and enhancement of lakes, consisting of improvements such as dredging, water aeration, shoreline stabilization and reconditioning, basin reconditioning, fish stocking, and installation of rock shelters, seal coats, and rip-rap.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5680.

Disbursement of a grant for an approved proposal shall be contingent on the recipient’s completion of both of the following conditions:

(a) The grant recipient shall enter into an agreement with the Department of Parks and Recreation specifying the terms and conditions under which it shall rehabilitate, develop, maintain, and operate the urban fishing lake. The minimum term for the agreement shall be 25 years.

(b) The legal counsel of the grant recipient shall certify to the satisfaction of both departments that the recipient has met, or will meet prior to expenditure of any grant funds, all federal, state, and local environmental, public health, relocation, affirmative action, and clearinghouse requirements and other applicable laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5681.

Consistent with the provisions of this chapter, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall specify the procedures to be followed in applying for grants, establish the terms and conditions under which grants shall be made, and administer the disbursement of all grant funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5682.

Grant funds shall be encumbered by the recipient within two years of disbursement. Any grant funds not encumbered within this period shall revert to the Resources Account in the Energy and Resources Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5683.

The grant recipient or any instrumentality of the recipient shall not charge any fee for fishing at any lake the rehabilitation of which is financed, in whole or part, pursuant to this chapter. This prohibition does not extend to any fee charged by the recipient for any facility or service that is unrelated to fishing at a lake.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5684.

This chapter is not intended, nor shall it be construed, to authorize either the Department of Parks and Recreation or the Department of Fish and Game to establish any additional personnel positions or create any new administrative section in connection with the program established by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5685.

In order to facilitate the earliest possible start of the urban fishing program and to gain familiarity with the types of lakes that are most suitable for rehabilitation for sportfishing purposes, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall make grants, on a demonstration basis during the 1981–82 fiscal year only, for the rehabilitation of lakes that satisfy the requirements and criteria set forth in this chapter and are representative of lakes of different size, physical characteristics, and degree of degradation found in major metropolitan areas of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5686.

No grant shall be made under this chapter on or after the date on which the Energy and Resources Fund is abolished, unless a later enacted statute which is chaptered before that date changes the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective March 25, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.7. Community Parklands Act of 1986 [5700. - 5738.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5700. - 5702.]

5700.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Community Parklands Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5701.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(a) It is the responsibility of the state to encourage, and assist in the provision of, better parks and enhanced recreational opportunities for all citizens of California.

(b) Community, neighborhood, and regional parks, beaches, recreational areas, recreational trails, and other recreational facilities, and the preservation of historic sites and structures contribute significantly to a healthy physical and moral environment and also contribute to the economic betterment of the state. 

(c) Many older parks and recreational facilities have deteriorated to the point where the original investment in them may become lost, and prompt action is necessary to restore them to usefulness.

(d) Accordingly, it is in the public interest for the state to assist counties, cities, and districts in providing these facilities for the use and enjoyment of citizens they serve.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5702.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “District” means any regional park district formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3 and any recreation and park district formed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780). With respect to any community which is not included within a regional park district or a recreation and park district and in which no city or county provides parks or recreational areas or facilities, “district” also means any other district which is authorized by statute to operate and manage parks or recreational areas or facilities, employs a full-time park and recreation director and offers year-round park and recreation services on lands and facilities owned by the district, and allocates a substantial portion of its annual operating budget to parks or recreation areas or facilities.

(b) “Fund” means the Community Parklands Fund.

(c) “Program” means the Community Parklands Program established by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Community Parklands Program [5710. - 5712.]

5710.

(a) The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Community Parklands Fund, which is hereby created.

(b) All money deposited in the fund shall be available for appropriation in the manner set forth in Section 5735 in an amount not to exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for grants to counties, cities, and districts for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, or restoration of real property for park, beach, recreational, or historical resources preservation purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5711.

(a) The total amount proposed to be appropriated for the program shall be included in a section in the Budget Bill for the 1987–88 fiscal year and each succeeding fiscal year for consideration by the Legislature and shall bear the caption “Community Parklands Program.”

(b) Commencing with the Budget Bill for the 1990–91 fiscal year, any grant funds which were not accepted by a recipient or were not encumbered by the recipient within the three-year period specified in Section 5721 or which were restored pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5723 shall be available for appropriation for one or more projects of the type specified in Section 5712 that the Legislature deems to be of the highest priority statewide.

(c) All appropriations are subject to all limitations enacted in the Budget Act and to all fiscal procedures prescribed by law with respect to the expenditure of state funds unless expressly exempted from those laws by a statute enacted by the Legislature. The section in the Budget Act shall contain proposed appropriations only for the program contemplated by this chapter, and no funds derived from the bonds authorized by this chapter may be expended pursuant to an appropriation not contained in that section of the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5712.

The grant funds authorized for the program may be expended by the recipient for any of the following purposes or any combination thereof:

(a) The rehabilitation, improvement, or restoration of deteriorated roads, utilities, and other structures and facilities within existing parks and recreational areas.

(b) Neighborhood, community, and regional parks.

(c) Beaches and public accessways to beaches.

(d) Historical sites and structures.

(e) Recreational areas and facilities.

(f) Hiking, bicycling, and equestrian trails.

(g) Development rights and scenic easements in connection with any acquisition made for any purpose specified in subdivisions (b) to (f), inclusive, so long as the right or easement directly enhances the enjoyment or usefulness of the acquisition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration [5720. - 5725.]

5720.

(a) The grant funds authorized for the program shall be allocated to counties, cities, and districts on the basis of their populations, as determined by the Department of Parks and Recreation in cooperation with the Department of Finance on the basis of the most recent verifiable census data and such other population data as the Department of Parks and Recreation may require to be furnished by any county, city, or district.

(b) Forty percent of the total funds available for grants shall be allocated to counties and regional park, open-space, or park and open-space districts formed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500). Each county’s allocation shall be in the same ratio as the county’s population is to the state’s total population, except that each county shall be entitled to a minimum allocation of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). In any county that embraces all or part of the territory of a regional park, open-space, or park and open-space district whose board of directors is not the county board of supervisors, the amount allocated to the county shall be apportioned between the county and the regional district in proportion to the population of the county that is included within the territory of the regional district and the population of the county that is outside the territory of the regional district.
